Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB940.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "sexual abuse or exploitation" in section 6303(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6303. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Sexual abuse or exploitation." Any of the following:(1) The employment, use, persuasion, inducement, enticement or coercion of a child to engage in or assist another individual to engage in sexually explicit conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, the following:123456789101112131415161718 (i) Looking at the sexual or other intimate parts of a child or another individual for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire in any individual.(ii) Participating in sexually explicit conversation either in person, by telephone, by computer or by a computer-aided device for the purpose of sexual stimulation or gratification of any individual.(iii) Actual or simulated sexual activity or nudity for the purpose of sexual stimulation or gratification of any individual.(iv) Actual or simulated sexual activity for the purpose of producing visual depiction, including photographing, videotaping, computer depicting or filming.This paragraph does not include consensual activities between a child who is 14 years of age or older and another person who is 14 years of age or older and whose age is within four years of the child's age.(2) Any of the following offenses committed against a child:[(i) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).](i.1) Trafficking in minors as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals).(i.2) Involuntary servitude as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3012 (relating to involuntary servitude).(i.3) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(ii) Statutory sexual assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual 20250HB0940PN1006 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assault).(iii) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(iv) Sexual assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).(v) Institutional sexual assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault).(vi) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(vii) Indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3126 (relating to indecent assault).(viii) Indecent exposure as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure).(ix) Incest as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 4302 (relating to incest).(x) Prostitution as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(xi) Sexual abuse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).(xii) Unlawful contact with a minor as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6318 (relating to unlawful contact with minor).(xiii) Sexual exploitation as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6320 (relating to sexual exploitation of children).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0940PN1006 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930